Utah statutes.
59-2-1311.   Treasurer to advise commission of taxes unpaid on its
assessments -- Notice to property owners.
Each county treasurer shall, during the first week in February of each year,
report to the commission the name of each person who has failed to pay the
taxes assessed and levied against the person during the preceding year upon
property assessed by the commission.  The commission shall note that the prior
year's taxes are delinquent on the next tax notice sent to property owners
under Section 59-2-1307.
